Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1202

Member approval of other disposition of assets.

A sale, lease, exchange, license, or other disposition of assets of a limited cooperative association, other than a disposition described in RCW 23.100.1201, requires approval of the association's members under RCW 23.100.1203 and 23.100.1204 if the disposition leaves the association without significant continuing business activity.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1202.]